Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 7 Nominations and Primary Elections
7-7-305. Printing of ballots — Form — Draw for ballot position.

(a)

The ballots of the primary election shall be provided by the county board of election commissioners. The form of the ballots shall be the same as is provided by law for ballots in general elections in this state. A different color ballot may be used to distinguish between political parties.

(b)(1)

The order in which the names of the respective candidates are to appear on the ballots at all preferential and general primary elections shall be determined by lot at the public meeting of the county board of election commissioners held not later than:

(A)

Seventy-two (72) days before a preferential primary election that is held in May under §7-7-203; and

(B)

Eighty-nine (89) days before a preferential primary election that is held in March under §7-7-203.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall give at least ten (10) days' written notice of the time and place of the meeting to the chairs of the county committees if the chairs are not members of the county board of election commissioners, and at least three (3) days before the meeting, shall publish notice of the time and place of holding the meeting in some newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(c)(1)(A)

A person who files for an elective office in this state may use not more than three (3) given names, one (1) of which may be a nickname or any other word used to identify the person to the voters, and may add as a prefix to his or her name the title or an abbreviation of an elective public office the person currently holds.

(B)

A person may use as the prefix the title of a nonpartisan judicial office in an election for a nonpartisan judicial office only if:

(i)

The person is currently serving in a nonpartisan judicial office to which the person has been elected in the last election for the office; or

(ii)

The person:

(a)

Is a candidate for the office of circuit judge or district judge;

(b)

Is currently serving in the office of circuit judge or district judge as an appointee; and

(c)

Has been serving in that position for at least twelve (12) months.

(C)

A nickname shall not include a professional or honorary title.

(2)

The person filing for office shall include his or her surname in addition to any given names permitted under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section.

(3)

The names and titles as proposed to be used by each candidate on the political practices pledge or, if the political practices pledge is not filed by the filing deadline, then the names and titles that appear on the party certificate shall be reviewed no later than one (1) business day after the filing deadline by the Secretary of State for state and district offices and by the county board of election commissioners for county, township, school, and municipal offices.

(4)(A)

The name of every candidate shall be printed on the ballot in the form as certified by either the Secretary of State or the county board of election commissioners.

(B)

However, the county board of election commissioners may substitute an abbreviated title if the ballot lacks space for the title requested by a candidate.

(C)

The county board of election commissioners shall immediately notify a candidate whose requested title is abbreviated by the county board of election commissioners.

(5)

A candidate shall not be permitted to change the form in which his or her name will be printed on the ballot after the deadline for filing the political practices pledge.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 14; 1971, No. 261, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-114; Acts 1991, No. 408, § 1; 1995, No. 901, § 9; 1999, No. 1335, § 1; 2001, No. 799, § 1; 2001, No. 1835, § 1; 2003, No. 1731, § 6; 2007, No. 559, § 6; 2007, No. 1020, § 16; 2007, No. 1049, § 27; 2009, No. 959, § 39; 2011, No. 1185, § 11; 2013, No. 1075, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 3; 2019, No. 527, § 1; 2019, No. 545, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 6, provided:

“(a)

To ensure that independent candidates are provided the maximum number of days allowed by law to circulate petitions to qualify as an independent candidate, the provisions of this act are retroactive to August 1, 2015.

“(b)

Signatures on a petition to have the name of a person placed upon the ballot as an independent candidate under §7-7-103 collected between August 11, 2015, and the effective date of this act shall be counted if:

“(1)

The signatures are not otherwise collected in violation of Arkansas law;

“(2)

The signatures otherwise comply with applicable Arkansas law; and

“(3)

The petition is lawfully filed.”

Acts 2015, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 7, provided:

“(a)

This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)

The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)

On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)

The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 559 substituted “Secretary of State” for “State Board of Election Commissioners” in (c)(2), and for “state board” in (c)(3).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1020, in (b), substituted “board of election commissioners” for “committee,” “The county board shall give ten” for “Ten,” and “meeting to the county committee and shall” for “meeting shall be given each member by the chair, vice-chair, or secretary of the committee. The chair, vice chair, or secretary shall.”

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049 substituted “sixty-five (65) days” for “thirty-five (35) days” in (b).

The 2009 amendment, in (b), deleted “including candidates for federal, state, and local offices and including persons nominated for committee members and delegates to the county convention, and the order in which issues and measures” following “candidates,” inserted “at least” and “chairs of the,” and substituted “committees, if the chairs are not members of the board, and shall, at least three (3) days before the meeting” for “committee and shall”; substituted “use as the prefix the title of a judicial office” for “use the prefix ‘Judge’, ‘Justice’, or ‘Chief Justice’” in (c)(1)(B); inserted (c)(3)(B) and (c)(3)(C); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy-two (72)” for “sixty-five (65)” in (b).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (c)(1) and added (c)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “eighty-nine (89) days” for “seventy-two (72) days” in the first sentence of (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 527 inserted (c)(2), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment by No. 545 added the (b)(1), (b)(1)(A), and (b)(2) designations; substituted “a preferential primary election that is held in May under §7-7-203” for “the preferential primary election” in (b)(1)(A); added (b)(1)(B); and substituted “the county board of election commissioners, and at least” for “the board, and at least” in (b)(2).

7-7-306. Partisan and nonpartisan general election ballots.

(a)

At each party primary and nonpartisan general election, each county board of election commissioners shall furnish a separate ballot for each political party containing:

(1)

The name of each person seeking nomination as a candidate of that political party;

(2)

The name of each candidate for the general election to a nonpartisan office under §7-10-101 [repealed]; and

(3)

All measures and questions, if any, to be decided by the voters.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall also furnish a separate ballot containing the names of all qualified candidates for the general election to nonpartisan offices and all measures, if any, to be decided by the voters.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-115; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 10; 2005, No. 67, § 18; 2009, No. 959, § 39; 2013, No. 1110, § 8; 2013, No. 1126, § 14.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (b); inserted (a)(3); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1110 substituted “general election” for “judicial general” in the section heading; in the introductory language of (a), deleted “judicial” following “nonpartisan” and substituted “a separate ballot” for “separate ballots”; substituted “name of each person seeking nomination as a” for “names of persons seeking offices to be voted on as a nominee or” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “name of each candidate” for “names of all qualified candidates” and “office” for “judicial offices”; and, in (b), deleted “nonpartisan” following “separate” and deleted “judicial” following “nonpartisan”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1126 substituted “nomination as candidates” for “offices to be voted on as a nominee or candidate” in (a)(1).

7-7-307. Additional voter qualifications.

(a)

Each political party may establish by party rules additional qualifications to those established by §7-5-201 for eligibility to vote in primary elections of the party.

(b)

However, any additional qualifications established by a political party shall comply with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-115; Acts 1995, No. 928, § 2; 1995, No. 936, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 923, § 1, provided:

“In the event that the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 is repealed by the United States Congress or is ruled unconstitutional or void or otherwise invalidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, the following provisions of state statutory law enacted in order to comply with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 shall be repealed:

“(1)

References to voter registration activities conducted at public assistance agencies, disabilities agencies and any other agencies designated by state law, except for the Office of Driver Services of the Department of Finance and Administration and all State Revenue Offices;

“(2)

References to any data collection and record keeping requirements relating to voter registration activities conducted at public assistance agencies, disabilities agencies and any other agencies designated by state law, except for the Office of Driver Services of the Department of Finance and Administration and all State Revenue Offices;

“(3)

References to declination forms and any voter registration activities, data collection requirements and record keeping requirements relating to such forms;

“(4)

References to Congressional District Voter Registration Files;

“(5)

References to List Maintenance Files and related voter registration records, such as confirmation mailings; and

“(6)

References in Amendment 51-10(c), as amended by the 80th General Assembly in 1995, to an address confirmation program.”

U.S. Code.

The National Voter Registration Act of 1993, referred to in this section, is primarily codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.

7-7-308. Voting procedure and requirements.

(a)

The procedure for voting in primary elections is the same as for general elections.

(b)

At the same time that the voter identifies himself or herself and the party primary or other election in which he or she intends to vote, the election official shall mark next to the voter's name on the precinct voter registration list the party primary or other election in which the voter chooses to vote.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 157, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-126; Acts 1993, No. 487, § 3; 1995, No. 901, § 11; 1995, No. 946, § 10; 1995, No. 963, § 10; 1997, No. 886, § 7; 2005, No. 67, § 19; 2007, No. 1020, § 17; 2009, No. 959, § 40.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote (a)(5)(C); added (a)(8); rewrote (b); inserted “separate” in (e); and substituted “list-of-voters form” for “list” in (f).

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a); and deleted (c) through (g).

7-7-309. Canvass and certification of returns.

The county board of election commissioners shall canvass the returns and examine the ballots when demanded. It may hear testimony, if offered, of fraudulent practices and illegal votes, may cast out illegal votes and fraudulent returns, may find the true and legal vote cast for each candidate, and shall certify the result not sooner than forty-eight (48) hours and not later than ten (10) days after the primary.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-116; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 12; 1997, No. 886, § 8; 2001, No. 1475, § 2; 2007, No. 1020, § 18.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted “not sooner than forty-eight (48) hours and.”

7-7-310. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning filing and preservation of returns, ballots, and other documents, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 959, § 41. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-118; Acts 1993, No. 487, § 4; 1995, No. 901, § 13; 1995, No. 925, § 1; 1995, No. 939, § 1; 1995, No. 946, § 11; 1995, No. 963, § 11; 1997, No. 886, § 9; 2005, No. 67, § 20.

7-7-311. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning delivery and custody of ballots and stubs and destruction of stubs, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 886, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-119; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 14.

7-7-312. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning common polling places, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 67, § 21. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 467, § 1; 1995, No. 901, § 15; 1995, No. 946, § 12; 1995, No. 963, § 12.

7-7-313. Unopposed races.

If there is a primary election in which only one (1) candidate has filed for the position by a filing deadline and there are no other ballot issues to be submitted for consideration, the county board of election commissioners may declare and certify the candidate as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 812, § 1; 2017, No. 730, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “declare and certify the candidate as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election” for “reduce the number of polling places or open no polling places on election day so that the election is conducted by absentee ballot and early voting only”.

Subchapter 4

— Certification of Nominations

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1995, No. 901, § 21: Apr. 4, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state should provide for a state supported political primary system; and that this act should become effective immediately for the proper administration of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 12: Emergency clause failed. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution becomes effective on July 1, 2001; that this implements the nonpartisan election of justices and judges as mandated by Amendment 80; and that to effectively implement Amendment 80, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

7-7-401. Certification of nominations.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall certify the nomination of all county, township, and municipal offices to the county committee of the political party, state committee of the political party, and county clerk. It shall further certify the vote of all candidates for United States, state, and district office to the state committee and the Secretary of State.

(b)

The Secretary of State shall receive the returns from the county board of election commissioners and canvass and certify the result thereof as provided by law. When ordered by a circuit court as provided by law, the county board or its officers shall annul the certifications made and make certifications in accordance with the judgment of the circuit court.

(c)

The nominations of any and all political parties for candidates chosen at a regular or special primary election held by the political party shall be certified by the county board of election commissioners.

(d)(1)

Nominees of political parties chosen by a convention of delegates, in those circumstances in which nominations by political party conventions are authorized by law, shall be certified by the chair and secretary of the convention of delegates held by the political party.

(2)

All certificates of nomination made by the chair and secretary of conventions or of county boards of election commissioners of primary elections shall be acknowledged before an officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

(e)(1)

Nomination as a nonpartisan candidate for Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, or district judge shall be deemed certified upon the candidate's filing for office when a filing fee is paid or upon determination by the appropriate officer that sufficient signatures were obtained when the candidate seeks alternative ballot access.

(2)

For any other office, nomination as an independent candidate without political party affiliation for election to any office shall be certified by petition of electors in the manner provided in §7-7-103.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, §§ 17, 20; 1971, No. 261, § 8; 1975, No. 601, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-117, 3-120; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 16; 1997, No. 886, § 11; 2001, No. 1789, § 7.

7-7-402. Filing certificates of nomination.

(a)(1)

All certified lists of nominees as candidates for presidential electors and members of the United States Congress and for state, judicial, and district officers, either by convention, primary election, or electors, shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(2)

All certified lists of nominees for county, township, and municipal offices shall be filed with the county board of election commissioners and the county clerk of the county in which they are to be voted for no later than ninety (90) days before the general election.

(b)

Certified lists of nomination shall be filed within the time provided in §7-7-203.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 21; 1975, No. 601, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-121; Acts 1999, No. 656, § 1; 2019, No. 649, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added “no later than ninety (90) days before the general election” in (a)(2).

7-7-403. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning declination of nomination, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1049, § 28. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-122.

Subchapter 5

— Counties Using Voting Machines

7-7-501 — 7-7-504. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The repeal of §7-7-504 by Acts 1995, No. 901 has been deemed to supersede its amendment by Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963. Former §7-7-504 was amended by identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, § 13, effective January 1, 1995, to read as follows:

“(a)

In voting machine counties where common polling places are established, the county clerk shall furnish each county committee represented at the polling place one (1) copy of the appropriate precinct voter registration list to determine each person's right to vote in any party primary being conducted at the common polling place.

“(b)

Where separate polling places are established, a copy of the appropriate precinct voter registration list shall be delivered to each county committee by the county clerk.”

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning counties using voting machines, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 901, § 17. The sections were derived from:

7-7-501. Acts 1973, No. 157, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-127.

7-7-502. Acts 1973, No. 157, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-123.

7-7-503. Acts 1973, No. 157, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-124.

7-7-504. Acts 1973, No. 157, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-125; Acts 1995, No. 946, § 13, 1995, No. 963, § 13.